nl: Drumsleutel aandrijving type: Zeskant; Multitool (meerdere aansluitingen); Vierkant (standaard drumsleutel); Drievleugelig; Anders
tr: Davul anahtarı tahrik türü: Altıgen; Çok amaçlı (çoklu sürücü); Kare (standart bateri anahtarı); Üçlü kanat; Diğer
cs: Typ pohonu bubnového klíče: Šestihranný; Multifunkční (více upínání); Čtyřhranný (standardní ladicí klíč); Tříkřídlý; Ostatní
ja: ドラムキー駆動タイプ: 六角; マルチツール (複数ドライブ); 四角 (標準ドラムキー); トライウィング; その他
hu: A dobkulcs meghajtásának típusa: Hatszögletű; Multiszerszám (többféle fej); Négyzetes (normál dobkulcs); Háromszárnyú; Egyéb
th: รูปแบบหัวต่อกุญแจตั้งกลอง: หกเหลี่ยม; อเนกประสงค์ (หลายหัว); สี่เหลี่ยม (กุญแจกลองมาตรฐาน); สามแฉก; อื่นๆ
es: Tipo de accionamiento por llave de tambor: Hexagonal; Multiherramienta (múltiples cabezales); Cuadrada (llave de batería estándar); Tri-wing; Otro
pt-PT: tipo de acionamento da chave do tambor: Sextavado; Multiferramenta (vários encaixes); Quadrado (chave de bateria padrão); Três pontas; Outro
zh-TW: 鼓調音鑰匙驅動類型: 六角; 多功能工具 (多種起子頭); 方形 (標準鼓鎖); 三翼; 其他
nb: Drivtype for trommelnøkkel: Sekskant; Flerverktøy (flere hoder); Firkant (standard trommenøkkel); Tri-wing; Annet
bg-BG: Тип задвижване на ключа за барабани: Шестостен; Мултитул (множество накрайници); Квадрат (стандартен ключ за барабани); Трикрил; Друго
zh-CN: 鼓键驱动类型: 六角; 多功能工具（多驱动头）; 方形（标准鼓钥匙）; 三翼; 其他
ru: Тип привода барабанного ключа: Шестигранный; Мультитул (несколько головок); Квадратный (стандартный барабанный ключ); Трехлучевой (Tri-wing); Другое
de: Antriebsart des Stimmschlüssels: Sechskant; Multitool (mehrere Antriebe); Vierkant (Standard-Stimmschlüssel); Tri-Wing; Sonstige
pl: Typ napędu klucza perkusyjnego: Sześciokątny; Multitool (różne końcówki); Kwadratowy (standardowy klucz perkusyjny); Trójramienny; Inny
hr-HR: Vrsta pogona tipke bubnja: Šesterokutni; Višenamjenski alat (višestruki prihvatici); Kvadratni (standardni ključ za bubnjeve); Trokraki (tri-wing); Ostalo
en: Drum key drive type: Hex; Multi-tool (multiple drives); Square (standard drum key); Tri-wing; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta pogona bobna: Šesterokotni (Hex); Večnamensko orodje (več priključkov); Kvadratni (standardni bobnarski ključ); Trikrilni; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de acionamento da chave do tambor: Hexagonal; Multiferramenta (vários encaixes); Quadrado (chave de bateria padrão); Tri-wing; Outro
fr: Type d’entraînement de clé de batterie: Hexagonale; Multifonction (embouts multiples); Carrée (clé de batterie standard); Tri-wing; Autre
sv: Drivtyp för trumnyckel: Sexkant; Multiverktyg (flera fattningar); Fyrkant (standardtrumnyckel); Trevingad; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tipul de acționare a cheilor tobe: Hexagonal; Multifuncțional (mai multe capete); Pătrat (cheie standard de tobe); În trei colțuri (tri-wing); Altele
lt-LT: Būgno rakto pavaros tipas: Šešiabriaunis; Daugiafunkcis (kelios galvutės); Kvadratinis (standartinis būgno raktas); Trijų sparnelių („Tri-wing“); Kita
sk-SK: Typ pohonu kláves bubna: Šesťhran; Multifunkčný nástroj (viacero hláv); Štvorcový (štandardný kľúč na bicie); Trojkrídlový; Iné
fi: Rummun viritysavaimen käyttötyyppi: Kuusio; Monitoimi (useita päitä); Neliö (vakio rumpuavain); Tri-wing; Muu
vi: Loại truyền động khóa trống: Lục giác; Đa năng (nhiều đầu vặn); Vuông (khóa trống tiêu chuẩn); Ba cánh; Khác
ko: 드럼 키 구동 방식: 헥스; 멀티툴 (다중 드라이브); 사각 (표준 드럼 키); 트라이 윙; 기타
it: Tipo di azionamento della chiave del tamburo: Esagonale; Multiutensile (attacchi multipli); Quadrata (chiave standard per batteria); Tri-wing; Altro
da: Drivmekanisme til stemmenøgle: Sekskant; Multiværktøj (flere drev); Firkant (standard trommenøgle); Tri-wing; Andet
el: Τύπος κίνησης κλειδιού τυμπάνου: Εξάγωνο; Πολυεργαλείο (πολλαπλών κεφαλών); Τετράγωνο (τυπικό κλειδί τυμπάνων); Τριπλής πτέρυγας; Άλλο